Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 2
MONEY TRANSMITTER AGENTS

11-110-201. Agent information - rules.

A money transmitter licensed pursuant to part 1 of this article 110 shall annually send the following information to the banking board on such form as it may prescribe:

The name of each agent and the address and telephone number of each of the agent's offices that engage in the business of money transmission;

The name, address, and telephone number of each of the owners of the agent holding more than a ten percent interest in the business if the agent is a partnership or an entity created pursuant to title 7;

The services concerning money transmission that are offered by the agent and the locations where the services are offered;

Such other pertinent information that the banking board may require concerning the agent or its directors, trustees, officers, members, branches, subsidiaries, affiliates, or agents as promulgated by rule.

The banking board may promulgate rules necessary to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 587, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-52-201 as it existed prior to 2017.

11-110-202. Applicability - definition.

This part 2 does not apply to an agent of a business licensed pursuant to part 1 of this article 110 to the extent that the agent is selling or adding additional money to stored value issued by the business.

For purposes of this section, "stored value" means a card, code, or other device that is issued to a consumer in a specified dollar amount, which may or may not be increased in value, and is redeemable at a single merchant, an affiliated group of merchants, or multiple unaffiliated groups of merchants or usable at automated teller machines.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 587, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-52-202 as it existed prior to 2017.

11-110-203. Notice of laws - rules.

The banking board shall promulgate rules to create a form containing a notice of the contents of section 18-5-309 and other state and federal laws concerning money laundering.

An agent of a business licensed pursuant to part 1 of this article 110 shall require each employee who performs money transmission services to either:

Understand and sign the form, created under subsection (1) of this section, affirming knowledge of the money laundering laws prior to the employee performing the services; or

Receive training that covers the money laundering laws within thirty days before the employee performs the services.

The agent shall maintain a record of each employee along with the signed notice or evidence of training in compliance with subsection (2)(a) of this section so long as the employee provides the services. The records may be maintained in an electronic or digital format that reproduces the signature on the documents by the agent.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 587, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-52-203 as it existed prior to 2017.

11-110-204. Records.

The information sent to the banking board under section 11-110-201 and the records required by section 11-110-203 shall be open to any law enforcement officer acting within the scope and course of the officer's official duties.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 588, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-52-204 as it existed prior to 2017.

11-110-205. Agent requirements.

No money transmitter licensed pursuant to part 1 of this article 110 shall knowingly contract with an agent or owner of an agent holding more than a ten percent interest in the business who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to the offenses in article 5 of title 18; a felony in the selling or issuing of exchange or in money transmission; a felony involving a financial institution; or an equivalent crime outside Colorado.

No agent of a money transmitter licensed pursuant to this article 110 shall knowingly employ a person to perform money transmission services who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to the offenses in article 5 of title 18; a felony in the selling or issuing of exchange or in money transmission; a felony involving a financial institution; or an equivalent crime outside Colorado.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 588, § 2, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-52-205 as it existed prior to 2017.

11-110-206. Violations.

A person who violates this part 2 commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

A person who acts as an agent of an unlicensed person required to be licensed by part 1 of this article 110 knowing the unlicensed person does not hold the license commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 17-226), ch. 159, p. 588, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3153, § 133, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-52-206 as it existed prior to 2017.